Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.321

Real estate education program account.

The real estate education program account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All moneys received for credit to this account pursuant to RCW 18.85.311 and all moneys derived from fines imposed under this chapter shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be made only upon the authorization of the director or a duly authorized representative of the director, and may be used only for the purposes of carrying out the director's programs for education of real estate licensees, others in the real estate industry, and members of the public as described in RCW 18.85.041(6). All expenses and costs relating to the implementation or administration of, or payment of contract fees or charges for, the director's real estate education programs may be paid from this account. The account is subject to appropriation under chapter 43.88 RCW.

[ 2008 c 23 s 39; 1997 c 322 s 19; 1993 c 50 s 4. Formerly RCW 18.85.317.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 50: See note following RCW 18.85.061.